Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB417.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 247.940 TO 247.978 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "participating lender" means one (1) or more lending
institutions that:
(a) Have a physical office or offices located in Kentucky; and
(b) Enter into a loan participation agreement in accordance with the
requirements of this section.
(2) The corporation may:
(a) Establish, administer, and fund, to the extent funds are available, a
Farmland Preservation Loan Program in accordance with this section;
(b) Enter into a loan participation agreement with a qualified participating
lender to purchase interests in promissory notes made by a qualified
borrower enabling the borrower to purchase or improve an agricultural
property located within the Commonwealth;
(c) Purchase interests that do not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) or
seventy-five percent (75%) of the total amount of funds made to the
borrower;
(d) Approve any other eligible agricultural investment the board deems
reasonable; and
(e) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A as may be necessary for the administration of the Farmland
Preservation Loan Program.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:13 PM Jacketed